Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1813
Plea in abatement; misnomer; procedure.

If the accused shall plead in abatement that he is not indicted by his true name, he must plead what his true name is, which shall be entered on the minutes of the court, and after such entry the trial and all other proceedings on the indictment shall be had against him by that name, referring also to the name by which he is indicted, in the same manner in all respects as if he had been indicted by his true name.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 445, p. 822;

R.S.1913, § 9089;

C.S.1922, § 10114;

C.S.1929, § 29-1812;

R.S.1943, § 29-1813.